Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20266-113
Proof of claim.

(a) A proof of claim must:

(1) state the name, address, and other contact information reasonably necessary to communicate with the creditor;

(2) state the amount of the claim;

(3) briefly state the nature of the claim;

(4) identify any asset of the assignment estate securing the claim;

(5) be signed by the creditor under penalty of perjury;

(6) include a copy of a record, if any, on which the claim is based;

(7) be submitted using the method established under subdivision (b)(5) of section 6-109; and

(8) be submitted by the date established by the assignee under subdivision (b)(6) of section 6-109.

(b) A proof of claim submitted in compliance with this section is prima facie evidence of the validity and amount of the claim.

(c) The submission by a creditor of a proof of claim in compliance with this section constitutes the creditor's:

(1) consent to the jurisdiction of the court under section 6-121; and

(2) assignment to the assignee of any right of the creditor to bring a voidable transaction action relating to the creditor's claim.

Laws 2026, LB783, § 13.
July 18, 2026